Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5821XC (4) 91 je/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 96.11, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 17. Fact finding ââ information about claim. 3 a. The department shall establish a process whereby a 4 claimant and an employer may each provide information to the 5 department prior to the departmentâs fact-finding process for 6 a claim for benefits without the presence of or participation 7 by the other party. The department shall make any information 8 provided by a party in this way available to the other party 9 following the conclusion of each partyâs statement during the 10 joint fact-finding meeting interview. At the request of either 11 party, the department shall provide such information to each 12 party without the presence of or participation by the other 13 party. 14 b. The department shall give each party an opportunity to 15 provide a rebuttal or response to information provided by the 16 other party prior to the departmentâs initial determination of 17 the validity of the claim. At the request of either party, 18 the department shall provide such an opportunity without the 19 presence of or participation by the other party. 20 c. Information provided to the department pursuant to this 21 subsection shall be subject to the same standards applicable 22 to other information obtained by the department during the 23 fact-finding process for claims for benefits. 24